apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_det_pr_prn.ca.dix
 <pardef n="tercer__det">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="des/è__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r>è<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ena</l>
          <r>è<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r>è<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>è</l>
          <r>è<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
     
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="tot__predet">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="ambd/ós__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ós</l>
          <r>ós<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>ós<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="tot/s_dos__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s<b/>dos</l>
          <r>s<b/>dos<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es<b/>dues</l>
          <r>s<b/>dos<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="/el_meu__prn">
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>meues</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>meves</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>meua</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>meva</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>meus</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>meus</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>meu</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>meu</l>
          <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="/el_teu__prn">
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>teues</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>teves</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>teua</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>teva</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>teus</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>teus</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>teu</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>teu</l>
          <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="/el_seu__prn">
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>seues</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>seves</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>seua</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>seva</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>seus</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>seus</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>seu</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>seu</l>
          <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="/el_nostre__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>nostra</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="cinquè"><i>cinqu</i><par n="des/è__det"/></e>
<e lm="desè"><i>des</i><par n="des/è__det"/></e>
<e lm="novè"><i>nov</i><par n="des/è__det"/></e>
<e lm="primer"><i>primer</i><par n="tercer__det"/></e>
<e lm="quart"><i>quart</i><par n="tercer__det"/></e>
<e lm="segon"><i>segon</i><par n="tercer__det"/></e>
<e lm="setè"><i>set</i><par n="des/è__det"/></e>
<e lm="sisè"><i>sis</i><par n="des/è__det"/></e>
<e lm="tercer"><i>tercer</i><par n="tercer__det"/></e>
<e lm="últim"><i>últim</i><par n="tercer__det"/></e>
<e lm="vuitè"><i>vuit</i><par n="des/è__det"/></e>
<e lm="tot"><i>tot</i><par n="tot__predet"/></e>
<e lm="ambdós"><i>ambd</i><par n="ambd/ós__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el meu"><par n="/el_meu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el nostre"><par n="/el_nostre__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el seu"><par n="/el_seu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el teu"><par n="/el_teu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tots dos"><i>tot</i><par n="tot/s_dos__prn"/></e>
